apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="/abbast__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l>abbast</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbast</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbast</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbast</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbumst</l>   <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbist</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbast</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbaðist</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbaðist</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbaðist</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbuðumst</l> <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbuðust</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbuðust</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbist</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbist</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbist</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbumst</l>   <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbist</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbist</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbaðist</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbaðist</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbaðist</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbuðumst</l> <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbuðust</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbuðust</l>  <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abba</l>      <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öbbumst</l>   <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>abbist</l>    <r>abbast<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gr/áta__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l>æt</l>        <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ætur</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ætur</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átum</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átið</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>áta</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ét</l>        <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ést</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ét</l>        <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>étum</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>étuð</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>étu</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>áti</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átir</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>áti</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átum</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átið</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>áti</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>éti</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>étir</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>éti</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>étum</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>étuð</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>étu</l>       <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>át</l>        <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átum</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átið</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>átið</l>      <r>áta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gráta">           <i>gr</i><par n="gr/áta__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="láta">            <i>l</i><par n="gr/áta__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="láta af">         <i>l</i><par n="gr/áta__vblex"/><p><l><b/>af</l><r><g><b/>af</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="abbast">          <i></i><par n="/abbast__vblex"/></e>
